Massachusetts, session 194th, H1939.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 184 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
24 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 24. When any owner of land or of any interest in such land, signs an instrument
in writing conveying or purporting to convey his land or any interest therein, or in any manner
affecting or purporting to affect his title thereto or an interest therein, and the instrument,
whether or not entitled to record or registration, is recorded or registered and indexed in the
registry of deeds or registered land district for the district wherein such land is situated, and a
period of ten years elapses after the instrument is accepted for record or registration, and the
instrument or the record or registration thereof because of defect, irregularity or omission fails to
comply in any respect with any requirement of law relating (1) to seals, corporate or individual,
(2) to the form of grantor clause in which a person purports to grant, mortgage, assign, release or
discharge an interest in real property as representative of or on behalf of a person, trust or entity
of 3

who owns or holds such interest and is also named in the grantor clause, (3) to the form or
validity of an acknowledgment or a certificate of acknowledgment, (4) to witnesses, attestation,
proof, method or form of execution, or the time of execution, (5) to recitals of consideration,
residence, address, or date, (6) to the authority of a person executing such an instrument on
behalf of an individual under a power of attorney, (7) to the method or form by which a person
acting under a power of attorney executes such an instrument on behalf of the principal, (8) to
the authority of a person executing such an instrument on behalf of a trust or entity and
purporting to hold the office or position of trustee, manager, partner, president, vice president,
treasurer or other similar office or position, including assistant to any such office or position, or
otherwise purporting to be an authorized signatory for such trust or entity, including under a
power of attorney on behalf of such trust or entity, or (9) to the method or form by which such
person executes such an instrument on behalf of a trust or entity, such instrument and the record
thereof shall, notwithstanding any or all of such defects, irregularities and omissions, be effective
for all purposes to the same extent as though the instrument and the record thereof had originally
not been subject to the defect, irregularity or omission, or to the form of grantor clause in which
a person purports to grant, mortgage, assign, release or discharge an interest in real property in a
capacity other than that in which such person actually owns or holds such interest, unless within
said period of ten years a proceeding is commenced on account of the defect, irregularity or
omission, and notice thereof pursuant to section 15 of this chapter is duly recorded or registered
as appropriate and indexed and noted on the margin thereof under the name of the signer of the
instrument, the owner or holder of the affected interest at the time of the recording or registration
of the instrument and the record owner or holder of the interest at the time of the filing of such
notice and, in the event of such proceeding, unless relief is thereby in due course granted.
of 3

SECTION 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to instruments and documents
recorded or registered before, on or after the effective date, except as to any such instruments or
documents for which a court proceeding challenging the effectiveness or validity of any such
instrument or document and the title derived therefrom has been commenced pursuant to this
section as in effect prior to said effective date.
of 3